Louisiana, session 2026, HB283.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Teacher's Shield Act".
Section 2. R.S. 17:15(A)(1)(b)(iii) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§15. Criminal history review
A.(1)
* * *
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 283 ENROLLED
(b)
* * *
(iii) Negligent hiring statutes or rules shall not apply to a dispute, litigation, or any
allegations when a city, parish, or other local public school board or a nonpublic school or
school system has hired a person as an administrator, teacher, substitute teacher, athletic
director, coach, or assistant coach, if the person has a valid teaching certificate or
authorization provided by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education.
* * *
Section 3. R.S. 17:416(A)(1)(b)(i) and (c)(vii)(aa) and (cc) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 17:47(C)(1)(a)(iv), 416(A)(1)(c)(vii)(ee), 500.1(C)(3), 1201(C)(3), and
1206.1(A)(3) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§47. Sick and personal leave
* * *
C.(1)(a)
* * *
(iv) Such sick leave may be used for purposes that include but are not limited
to medical treatment, psychological treatment, and physical rehabilitation.
* * *
§416. Discipline of students; suspension; expulsion
A.(1)
* * *
(b)(i) Each teacher and school employee may take disciplinary action to
correct a student who violates school rules or who interferes with an orderly
education process. No principal or administrator shall prohibit or discourage a
teacher or school employee from taking disciplinary action, recommending
disciplinary action, or completing a form to initiate disciplinary action against a
student who violates school policy or who interferes with an orderly education
process. No principal or administrator shall retaliate or take adverse employment
action against a teacher or school employee for taking disciplinary action against a
student. Each school shall annually provide written notice at the beginning of each
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 283 ENROLLED
school year to each teacher and school employee, including bus operators, of their
rights to take or request disciplinary action against a student in accordance with this
Section. Notice shall also include eligibility for sick and personal leave in the event
that a school employee is injured by a student who committed an assault or battery
against a teacher in accordance with R.S. 14:34.3 or R.S. 14:38.2. The provisions of
this Item shall apply only if the disciplinary action that the teacher or school
employee takes is in accordance with policy adopted by the public school governing
authority.
* * *
(c)
* * *
(vii)(aa) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, whenever a
student is formally accused of violating the provisions of R.S. 14:34.3 or school
disciplinary rules, or both, by committing a battery on any school employee either
on or off of school property or is formally accused of violating the provisions of R.S.
14:38.2 or school disciplinary rules, or both, by committing an assault on any school
employee either on or off of school property, the principal shall suspend the student
from school immediately and the student shall be removed immediately from the
school premises or prohibited from returning to the school premises, as applicable,
without the benefit of the out-of-school suspension procedures provided by this
Section; however, the necessary notifications and other procedures shall be
implemented as soon as is practicable. For purposes of this Item, "school employee"
means any person employed by the school and any substitute teacher, substitute bus
operator, or school volunteer. The provisions of this Item shall apply to an incident
that occurs off of school property only if the incident is a continuation of a
documented altercation that began on school property.
* * *
(cc) Except when the school system has no other school of suitable grade
level for the student to attend, no student found guilty by a court of competent
jurisdiction of violating the provisions of R.S. 14:34.3 or 38.2, or both, or found
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 283 ENROLLED
guilty at a school system suspension hearing of committing a battery or assault, or
both, on any school employee, or both, shall be assigned to attend or shall attend the
school to which the school employee battered or assaulted by the student is assigned.
The principal or his designee shall immediately recommend the student's expulsion,
which shall be subject to the provisions of Subsection C of this Section except as
provided in this Subitem. Any such expulsion shall be no less than two complete
school semesters in duration, during which time the superintendent shall place the
student in an alternative school or in an alternative educational placement as
provided in Subparagraph (2)(c) of this Subsection and the student shall participate
in an anger management program. A student expelled as provided in this Subitem
shall not, under any circumstances, be assigned to or allowed to attend the school to
which the student or school employee battered or assaulted by the student is
assigned. However, except as otherwise provided in this Subitem, discipline of a
student with exceptionalities shall not conflict with Paragraphs (5) and (6) of this
Subsection, R.S. 17:1941 et seq., and 20 U.S.C. 1415(k).
* * *
(ee) All documentation relative to the provisions of this Item shall be
included and maintained in the student's records.
* * *
§500.1. School bus operators; sick leave
* * *
C.
* * *
(3) Such sick leave may be used for purposes that include but are not limited
to medical treatment, psychological treatment, and physical rehabilitation.
* * *
§1201. Amount of sick leave; reimbursement; injury on the job
* * *
C.
* * *
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 283 ENROLLED
(3) Such sick leave may be used for purposes that include but are not limited
to medical treatment, psychological treatment, and physical rehabilitation.
* * *
§1206.1. School employees; sick leave
A.
* * *
(3) Such sick leave may be used for purposes that include but are not limited
to medical treatment, psychological treatment, and physical rehabilitation.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.